Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-14] Severability. If any
provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect
without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
this chapter are severable. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 142, §3;
am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next